Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 396.540 is amended to read:
396.540. (1)  Armories may be used by members and units of the organized militia in accordance
with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter and ORS chapters 398 and 399.
(2) Armories may be used by any veterans’ organizations and their auxiliaries located in  the
community where the armory is located, provided such use will  not interfere with the use of the
facilities by the organized militia or result in risk to  federal or state property, and provided that the
organization makes a written request therefor and pays for heat, lights, janitor  service and other
expense required by such use.
(3) Armories may be used by any federal, state,  county [ and] or  municipal bureau, agency or
department or by the Armed  Forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, or by the re-
serve components thereof for their official business, provided that  such use does not interfere with
the members and units of the organized militia stationed in such  armory, and provided that such use
is approved by the officer in charge thereof and by military  superiors as prescribed by military de-
partment regulations issued pursuant to this chapter and ORS chapters 398 and 399.
(4) Armories may be rented for use by a person, firm, association or corporation, not specified
elsewhere in this section, for such purposes and  upon such terms as may be approved by the officer
in charge of the armory and by military superiors as prescribed by military department  regulations
issued pursuant  to this chapter and ORS chapters 398 and 399 and provided that such use will not,
and only so long as such use does not, interfere with the use of the armory by  the members and
units of the organized militia stationed therein.
(5) The Oregon National  Guard Association described in ORS 399.460 may use an armory or
other military facility at no cost, provided that the use is approved by the officer in charge and  by
military superiors as prescribed by military department  regulations issued pursuant to this chapter
and ORS chapters 398 and 399.
(6) The Civil Air  Patrol, chartered under 36 U.S.C. 40301, or any wing thereof, may use
an armory or other  military facility for their official business at no cost, provided that the
use does not interfere with  the members and units of the organized militia stationed in the
armory or military facility, and provided that the use  is approved by the officer in charge
and by military superiors as prescribed by military department  regulations issued pursuant
to this chapter and ORS chapters 398 and 399.
Enrolled Senate Bill 806 (SB 806-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 806 (SB 806-INTRO) Page 2